Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.200

Petitions—Destruction on final refusal.

If no appeal is taken from the refusal of the secretary of state to file a petition within the time prescribed, or if an appeal is taken and the secretary of state is not required to file the petition by the mandate of either the superior or the supreme court, the secretary of state shall destroy it.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1821. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.79.180; prior: 1913 c 138 s 13, part; RRS s 5409, part. Formerly RCW 29.79.180.]